Illinois, session 104th, SB2423.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 52-3.71, 2-3.162, 10-22.6, 13B-20.25, 13B-20.30, and 13B-25.5 6as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.71)  (from Ch. 122, par. 2-3.71)8    Sec. 2-3.71. Grants for preschool educational programs.9    (a) Preschool program.10        (1) Through June 30, 2026, the State Board of 11    Education shall implement and administer a grant program 12    under the provisions of this subsection which shall 13    consist of grants to public school districts and other 14    eligible entities, as defined by the State Board of 15    Education, to conduct voluntary preschool educational 16    programs for children ages 3 to 5 which include a parent 17    education component. A public school district which 18    receives grants under this subsection may subcontract with 19    other entities that are eligible to conduct a preschool 20    educational program. These grants must be used to 21    supplement, not supplant, funds received from any other 22    source.23        (1.5) On and after July 1, 2026, the Department of   SB2423- 2 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1    Early Childhood shall implement and administer a grant 2    program for school districts and other eligible entities, 3    as defined by the Department, to conduct voluntary 4    preschool educational programs for children ages 3 to 5 5    which include a parent education component. A public 6    school district which receives grants under this 7    subsection may subcontract with other entities that are 8    eligible to conduct a preschool educational program. These 9    grants must be used to supplement, not supplant, funds 10    received from any other source. 11        (2) (Blank).12        (3) Except as otherwise provided under this subsection 13    (a), any teacher of preschool children in the program 14    authorized by this subsection shall hold a Professional 15    Educator License with an early childhood education 16    endorsement.17        (3.5) Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year and 18    until the 2028-2029 school year, an individual may teach 19    preschool children in an early childhood program under 20    this Section if he or she holds a Professional Educator 21    License with an early childhood education endorsement or 22    with short-term approval for early childhood education or 23    he or she pursues a Professional Educator License and 24    holds any of the following:25            (A) An ECE Credential Level of 5 awarded by the 26        Department of Human Services under the Gateways to   SB2423- 3 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1        Opportunity Program developed under Section 10-70 of 2        the Department of Human Services Act.3            (B) An Educator License with Stipulations with a 4        transitional bilingual educator endorsement and he or 5        she has (i) passed an early childhood education 6        content test or (ii) completed no less than 9 semester 7        hours of postsecondary coursework in the area of early 8        childhood education. 9        (4) (Blank).10        (4.5) Through June 30, 2026, the State Board of 11    Education shall provide the primary source of funding 12    through appropriations for the program. On and after July 13    1, 2026, the Department of Early Childhood shall provide 14    the primary source of funding through appropriations for 15    the program. Such funds shall be distributed to achieve a 16    goal of "Preschool for All Children" for the benefit of 17    all children whose families choose to participate in the 18    program. Based on available appropriations, newly funded 19    programs shall be selected through a process giving first 20    priority to qualified programs serving primarily at-risk 21    children and second priority to qualified programs serving 22    primarily children with a family income of less than 4 23    times the poverty guidelines updated periodically in the 24    Federal Register by the U.S. Department of Health and 25    Human Services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2). 26    For purposes of this paragraph (4.5), at-risk children are   SB2423- 4 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1    those who because of their home and community environment 2    are subject to such language, cultural, economic and like 3    disadvantages to cause them to have been determined as a 4    result of screening procedures to be at risk of academic 5    failure. Through June 30, 2026, such screening procedures 6    shall be based on criteria established by the State Board 7    of Education. On and after July 1, 2026, such screening 8    procedures shall be based on criteria established by the 9    Department of Early Childhood.10        Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (4.5), 11    grantees under the program must enter into a memorandum of 12    understanding with the appropriate local Head Start 13    agency. This memorandum must be entered into no later than 14    3 months after the award of a grantee's grant under the 15    program, except that, in the case of the 2009-2010 program 16    year, the memorandum must be entered into no later than 17    the deadline set by the State Board of Education for 18    applications to participate in the program in fiscal year 19    2011, and must address collaboration between the grantee's 20    program and the local Head Start agency on certain issues, 21    which shall include without limitation the following:22            (A) educational activities, curricular objectives, 23        and instruction;24            (B) public information dissemination and access to 25        programs for families contacting programs;26            (C) service areas;  SB2423- 5 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1            (D) selection priorities for eligible children to 2        be served by programs;3            (E) maximizing the impact of federal and State 4        funding to benefit young children;5            (F) staff training, including opportunities for 6        joint staff training;7            (G) technical assistance;8            (H) communication and parent outreach for smooth 9        transitions to kindergarten;10            (I) provision and use of facilities, 11        transportation, and other program elements;12            (J) facilitating each program's fulfillment of its 13        statutory and regulatory requirements;14            (K) improving local planning and collaboration; 15        and16            (L) providing comprehensive services for the 17        neediest Illinois children and families.18    Through June 30, 2026, if the appropriate local Head Start 19    agency is unable or unwilling to enter into a memorandum 20    of understanding as required under this paragraph (4.5), 21    the memorandum of understanding requirement shall not 22    apply and the grantee under the program must notify the 23    State Board of Education in writing of the Head Start 24    agency's inability or unwillingness. The State Board of 25    Education shall compile all such written notices and make 26    them available to the public. On and after July 1, 2026, if   SB2423- 6 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1    the appropriate local Head Start agency is unable or 2    unwilling to enter into a memorandum of understanding as 3    required under this paragraph (4.5), the memorandum of 4    understanding requirement shall not apply and the grantee 5    under the program must notify the Department of Early 6    Childhood in writing of the Head Start agency's inability 7    or unwillingness. The Department of Early Childhood shall 8    compile all such written notices and make them available 9    to the public. 10        (5) Through June 30, 2026, the State Board of 11    Education shall develop and provide evaluation tools, 12    including tests, that school districts and other eligible 13    entities may use to evaluate children for school readiness 14    prior to age 5. The State Board of Education shall require 15    school districts and other eligible entities to obtain 16    consent from the parents or guardians of children before 17    any evaluations are conducted. The State Board of 18    Education shall encourage local school districts and other 19    eligible entities to evaluate the population of preschool 20    children in their communities and provide preschool 21    programs, pursuant to this subsection, where appropriate.22        (5.1) On and after July 1, 2026, the Department of 23    Early Childhood shall develop and provide evaluation 24    tools, including tests, that school districts and other 25    eligible entities may use to evaluate children for school 26    readiness prior to age 5. The Department of Early   SB2423- 7 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1    Childhood shall require school districts and other 2    eligible entities to obtain consent from the parents or 3    guardians of children before any evaluations are 4    conducted. The Department of Early Childhood shall 5    encourage local school districts and other eligible 6    entities to evaluate the population of preschool children 7    in their communities and provide preschool programs, 8    pursuant to this subsection, where appropriate. 9        (6) Through June 30, 2026, the State Board of 10    Education shall report to the General Assembly by November 11    1, 2018 and every 2 years thereafter on the results and 12    progress of students who were enrolled in preschool 13    educational programs, including an assessment of which 14    programs have been most successful in promoting academic 15    excellence and alleviating academic failure. Through June 16    30, 2026, the State Board of Education shall assess the 17    academic progress of all students who have been enrolled 18    in preschool educational programs.19        Through fiscal year 2026, on or before November 1 of 20    each fiscal year in which the General Assembly provides 21    funding for new programs under paragraph (4.5) of this 22    Section, the State Board of Education shall report to the 23    General Assembly on what percentage of new funding was 24    provided to programs serving primarily at-risk children, 25    what percentage of new funding was provided to programs 26    serving primarily children with a family income of less   SB2423- 8 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1    than 4 times the federal poverty level, and what 2    percentage of new funding was provided to other programs. 3        (6.1) On and after July 1, 2026, the Department of 4    Early Childhood shall report to the General Assembly by 5    November 1, 2026 and every 2 years thereafter on the 6    results and progress of students who were enrolled in 7    preschool educational programs, including an assessment of 8    which programs have been most successful in promoting 9    academic excellence and alleviating academic failure. On 10    and after July 1, 2026, the Department of Early Childhood 11    shall assess the academic progress of all students who 12    have been enrolled in preschool educational programs. 13    Beginning in fiscal year 2027, on or before November 1 of 14    each fiscal year in which the General Assembly provides 15    funding for new programs under paragraph (4.5) of this 16    Section, the Department of Early Childhood shall report to 17    the General Assembly on what percentage of new funding was 18    provided to programs serving primarily at-risk children, 19    what percentage of new funding was provided to programs 20    serving primarily children with a family income of less 21    than 4 times the federal poverty level, and what 22    percentage of new funding was provided to other programs. 23        (7) Due to evidence that expulsion practices in the 24    preschool years are linked to poor child outcomes and are 25    employed inconsistently across racial and gender groups, 26    early childhood programs receiving State funds under this   SB2423- 9 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1    subsection (a) shall prohibit expulsions. Planned 2    transitions to settings that are able to better meet a 3    child's needs are not considered expulsion under this 4    paragraph (7).5            (A) When persistent and serious challenging 6        behaviors emerge, the early childhood program shall 7        document steps taken to ensure that the child can 8        participate safely in the program; including 9        observations of initial and ongoing challenging 10        behaviors, strategies for remediation and intervention 11        plans to address the behaviors, and communication with 12        the parent or legal guardian, including participation 13        of the parent or legal guardian in planning and 14        decision-making.15            (B) The early childhood program shall, with 16        parental or legal guardian consent as required, 17        utilize a range of community resources, if available 18        and deemed necessary, including, but not limited to, 19        developmental screenings, referrals to programs and 20        services administered by a local educational agency or 21        early intervention agency under Parts B and C of the 22        federal Individual with Disabilities Education Act, 23        and consultation with infant and early childhood 24        mental health consultants and the child's health care 25        provider. The program shall document attempts to 26        engage these resources, including parent or legal   SB2423- 10 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1        guardian participation and consent attempted and 2        obtained. Communication with the parent or legal 3        guardian shall take place in a culturally and 4        linguistically competent manner.5            (C) If there is documented evidence that all 6        available interventions and supports recommended by a 7        qualified professional have been exhausted and the 8        program determines in its professional judgment that 9        transitioning a child to another program is necessary 10        for the well-being of the child or his or her peers and 11        staff, with parent or legal guardian permission, both 12        the current and pending programs shall create a 13        transition plan designed to ensure continuity of 14        services and the comprehensive development of the 15        child. Communication with families shall occur in a 16        culturally and linguistically competent manner.17            (D) Nothing in this paragraph (7) shall preclude a 18        parent's or legal guardian's right to voluntarily 19        withdraw his or her child from an early childhood 20        program. Early childhood programs shall request and 21        keep on file, when received, a written statement from 22        the parent or legal guardian stating the reason for 23        his or her decision to withdraw his or her child.24            (E) In the case of the determination of a serious 25        safety threat to a child or others or in the case of 26        behaviors listed in subsection (d) of Section 10-22.6   SB2423- 11 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1        of this Code, the temporary removal of a child from 2        attendance in group settings may be used. Temporary 3        removal of a child from attendance in a group setting 4        shall trigger the process detailed in subparagraphs 5        (A), (B), and (C) of this paragraph (7), with the child 6        placed back in a group setting as quickly as possible.7            (F) Early childhood programs may utilize and the 8        Department of Early Childhood, State Board of 9        Education, the Department of Human Services, and the 10        Department of Children and Family Services shall 11        recommend training, technical support, and 12        professional development resources to improve the 13        ability of teachers, administrators, program 14        directors, and other staff to promote social-emotional 15        development and behavioral health, to address 16        challenging behaviors, and to understand trauma and 17        trauma-informed care, cultural competence, family 18        engagement with diverse populations, the impact of 19        implicit bias on adult behavior, and the use of 20        reflective practice techniques. Support shall include 21        the availability of resources to contract with infant 22        and early childhood mental health consultants.23            (G) Through June 30, 2026, early childhood 24        programs shall annually report to the State Board of 25        Education, and, beginning in fiscal year 2020, the 26        State Board of Education shall make available on a   SB2423- 12 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1        biennial basis, in an existing report, all of the 2        following data for children from birth to age 5 who are 3        served by the program:4                (i) Total number served over the course of the 5            program year and the total number of children who 6            left the program during the program year.7                (ii) Number of planned transitions to another 8            program due to children's behavior, by children's 9            race, gender, disability, language, class/group 10            size, teacher-child ratio, and length of program 11            day.12                (iii) Number of temporary removals of a child 13            from attendance in group settings due to a serious 14            safety threat under subparagraph (E) of this 15            paragraph (7), by children's race, gender, 16            disability, language, class/group size, 17            teacher-child ratio, and length of program day.18                (iv) Hours of infant and early childhood 19            mental health consultant contact with program 20            leaders, staff, and families over the program 21            year.22            (G-5) On and after July 1, 2026, early childhood 23        programs shall annually report to the Department of 24        Early Childhood, and beginning in fiscal year 2028, 25        the Department of Early Childhood shall make available 26        on a biennial basis, in a report, all of the following   SB2423- 13 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1        data for children from birth to age 5 who are served by 2        the program:3                (i) Total number served over the course of the 4            program year and the total number of children who 5            left the program during the program year.6                (ii) Number of planned transitions to another 7            program due to children's behavior, by children's 8            race, gender, disability, language, class/group 9            size, teacher-child ratio, and length of program 10            day.11                (iii) Number of temporary removals of a child 12            from attendance in group settings due to a serious 13            safety threat under subparagraph (E) of this 14            paragraph (7), by children's race, gender, 15            disability, language, class/group size, 16            teacher-child ratio, and length of program day.17                (iv) Hours of infant and early childhood 18            mental health consultant contact with program 19            leaders, staff, and families over the program 20            year. 21            (H) Changes to services for children with an 22        individualized education program or individual family 23        service plan shall be construed in a manner consistent 24        with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 25        Education Act.26        The Department of Early Childhood, in consultation   SB2423- 14 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1    with the Department of Children and Family Services, shall 2    adopt rules to administer this paragraph (7). 3        (8) Due to evidence that suspension practices in the 4    preschool years are linked to poor child outcomes and are 5    employed inconsistently across racial and gender groups, 6    early childhood programs receiving State funds under this 7    subsection (a) shall restrict suspensions. Planned 8    transitions to settings that are able to better meet a 9    child's needs are not considered suspension under this 10    paragraph (8). In no case may the decision to suspend a 11    student in preschool for 3 or more days be made by anyone 12    other than the superintendent of the school district, 13    director of an early childhood program, or their 14    equivalent nor may the length of the suspension for any 15    student in preschool be for longer than the number of days 16    required by the school district or early childhood program 17    to develop and implement a behavior intervention plan or 18    safety plan. 19    (b) (Blank).20    (c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, 21grantees may serve children ages 0 to 12 of essential workers 22if the Governor has declared a disaster due to a public health 23emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency 24Management Agency Act. For the purposes of this subsection, 25essential workers include those outlined in Executive Order 2620-8 and school employees. The State Board of Education shall   SB2423- 15 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1adopt rules to administer this subsection. 2    (d) Paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(1.5), (a)(4.5), (a)(5), 3(a)(5.1), (a)(6), (a)(6.1), and (a)(7) and subsection (c) of 4this Section are inoperative on and after July 1, 2026. 5(Source: P.A. 103-111, eff. 6-29-23; 103-594, eff. 6-25-24.) 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.162)7    Sec. 2-3.162. Student discipline report; school discipline 8improvement plan. 9    (a) On or before October 31, 2015 and on or before October 1031 of each subsequent year, the State Board of Education, 11through the State Superintendent of Education, shall prepare a 12report on student discipline in all school districts in this 13State, including State-authorized charter schools. This report 14shall include data from all public schools within school 15districts, including district-authorized charter schools. This 16report must be posted on the Internet website of the State 17Board of Education. The report shall include data on the 18issuance of out-of-school suspensions, expulsions, and 19removals to alternative settings in lieu of another 20disciplinary action, disaggregated by race and ethnicity, 21gender, age, grade level, whether a student is an English 22learner, incident type, and discipline duration. Such data 23shall be reported to the State Board of Education annually by 24all school districts in this State, including State-authorized 25charter schools, in a form and manner as specified by the State   SB2423- 16 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1Board of Education, no later than July 31 for the previous 2school year, and by July 31 of each year thereafter. 3    (b) The State Board of Education shall analyze the data 4under subsection (a) of this Section on an annual basis and 5determine the top 20% of school districts for the following 6metrics:7        (1) Total number of out-of-school suspensions divided 8    by the total district enrollment by the last school day in 9    September for the year in which the data was collected, 10    multiplied by 100.11        (2) Total number of out-of-school expulsions divided 12    by the total district enrollment by the last school day in 13    September for the year in which the data was collected, 14    multiplied by 100.15        (3) Racial disproportionality, defined as the 16    overrepresentation of students of color or white students 17    in comparison to the total number of students of color or 18    white students on October 1st of the school year in which 19    data are collected, with respect to the use of 20    out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, which must be 21    calculated using the same method as the U.S. Department of 22    Education's Office for Civil Rights uses.23    The analysis must be based on data collected over 3 24consecutive school years, beginning with the 2014-2015 school 25year.26    Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, the State Board   SB2423- 17 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1of Education shall require each of the school districts that 2are identified in the top 20% of any of the metrics described 3in this subsection (b) for 3 consecutive years to submit a plan 4identifying the strategies the school district will implement 5to reduce the use of exclusionary disciplinary practices or 6racial disproportionality or both, if applicable. School 7districts that no longer meet the criteria described in any of 8the metrics described in this subsection (b) for 3 consecutive 9years shall no longer be required to submit a plan. 10    This plan may be combined with any other improvement plans 11required under federal or State law.12    The calculation of the top 20% of any of the metrics 13described in this subsection (b) shall exclude all school 14districts, State-authorized charter schools, and special 15charter districts that issued fewer than a total of 10 16out-of-school suspensions or expulsions, whichever is 17applicable, during the school year. The calculation of the top 1820% of the metric described in subdivision (3) of this 19subsection (b) shall exclude all school districts with an 20enrollment of fewer than 50 white students or fewer than 50 21students of color.22    The plan must be approved at a public school board meeting 23and posted on the school district's Internet website. Within 24one year after being identified, the school district shall 25submit to the State Board of Education and post on the 26district's Internet website a progress report describing the   SB2423- 18 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1implementation of the plan and the results achieved. 2(Source: P.A. 99-30, eff. 7-10-15; 99-78, eff. 7-20-15; 3100-863, eff. 8-14-18.) 4    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.6)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.6)5    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)6    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 7searches. 8    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 9misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 10perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 11of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 12expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 13have been requested to appear at a meeting of the board, or 14with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss their 15child's behavior. Such request shall be made by registered or 16certified mail and shall state the time, place and purpose of 17the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer appointed by it, 18at such meeting shall state the reasons for dismissal and the 19date on which the expulsion is to become effective. If a 20hearing officer is appointed by the board, the hearing officer 21shall report to the board a written summary of the evidence 22heard at the meeting and the board may take such action thereon 23as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to expel a student, 24the written expulsion decision shall detail the specific 25reasons why removing the student from the learning environment   SB2423- 19 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1is in the best interest of the school. The expulsion decision 2shall also include a rationale as to the specific duration of 3the expulsion. An expelled student may be immediately 4transferred to an alternative program in the manner provided 5in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A student must not be 6denied transfer because of the expulsion, except in cases in 7which such transfer is deemed to cause a threat to the safety 8of students or staff in the alternative program. 9    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 10superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 11principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 12students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 13suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 14the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 15subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 16shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 17policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 18principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 19school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 20to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 21gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 22may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 23reasons. 24    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 25parents or guardian of a student along with a full statement of 26the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right to   SB2423- 20 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 2notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 3suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardian, 4the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 5review such action of the superintendent or principal, 6assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 7parents or guardian of the student may appear and discuss the 8suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 9officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 10a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 11its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 12hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 13appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 14subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 15decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 16misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 17suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 18specific duration of the suspension. 19    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 20and consequences available to school officials, school 21exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 22are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number 23and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 24extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 25only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 26students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is   SB2423- 21 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1recommended that school officials consider forms of 2non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 3suspensions or expulsions. 4    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 5Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 6by which school administrators are required to suspend or 7expel students for particular behaviors.8    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 9used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 10pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other 11students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 12subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 13other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 14a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 15School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 16such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 17length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.18    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 19out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 20and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 21only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 22disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the 23student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 24a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 25the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 26interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of   SB2423- 22 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other 2students, staff, or members of the school community" and 3"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 4operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case 5basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection 6(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 7available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 8exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 9shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 10address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student 11exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 12suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 13Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 14of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 15interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that 16there were no other appropriate and available interventions.17    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 18than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 19support services during the period of their suspension. For 20purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 21support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 22Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of 23this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 24to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 25such appropriate and available services. 26    A school district may refer students who are expelled to   SB2423- 23 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1appropriate and available support services.2    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 3re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 4expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 5consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 6Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 7and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 8suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 9alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 10Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 11    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 12suspended students, including those students suspended from 13the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 14school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 15equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 16a student's parent or guardian to notify school officials that 17a student suspended from the school bus does not have 18alternate transportation to school. 19    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 20local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 21meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 22the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.23    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 24provide ongoing professional development to all school 25personnel, school board members, and school resource officers, 26on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the   SB2423- 24 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 2involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 3culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 4environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 5the appropriate and available supportive services for the 6promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 7developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 8positive and healthy school climates. 9    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 10time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 11case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 12brought one of the following objects to school, any 13school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 14that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 15expelled for a period of not less than one year:16        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 17    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 18    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 19    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 20    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 21    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 22    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 23    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 24    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.25        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 26    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other   SB2423- 25 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 2    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 3    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 4    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 5    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 6    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 7Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 8consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 9Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 10expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 11transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 12Article 13A of the School Code.13    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 14superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 15principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 16student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 17a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 18calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 19that student has been determined to have made an explicit 20threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 21student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 22website through which the threat was made is a site that was 23accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 24was available to third parties who worked or studied within 25the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 26the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to   SB2423- 26 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1the safety and security of the threatened individual because 2of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 3student inside the school. 4    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 5authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 6lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 7equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 8personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 9without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 10search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 11Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 12privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 13left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 14the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 15conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 16lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 17controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 18illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 19searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 20If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 21evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 22the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 23such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 24disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 25turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.26    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or   SB2423- 27 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1expulsion from school and all school activities and a 2prohibition from being present on school grounds.3    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 4a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 5public or private school in this or any other state, the 6student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 7expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 8of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 9under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 10school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 11or staff in the alternative program.12    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 13students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 14difficulties.15    (i) A student may not be issued a monetary fine or fee as a 16disciplinary consequence, though this shall not preclude 17requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, stolen, 18or damaged property.19    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 20apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 21special charter districts, and school districts organized 22under Article 34 of this Code. 23    (k) The expulsion of students enrolled in programs funded 24under Section 1C-2 of this Code is subject to the requirements 25under paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 2-3.71 of 26this Code.   SB2423- 28 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 2district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 3focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 4positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 5A school district may employ a school social worker or a 6licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 7suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12. 8(Source: P.A. 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 9103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 8-9-24; revised 9-25-24.) 10    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)11    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 12searches. 13    (a) To expel students in grades 3 through 12 or, if 14required by federal or State law, students in kindergarten 15through grade 2 guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, 16including gross disobedience or misconduct perpetuated by 17electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) of this 18Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 19expulsion. Unless otherwise required by federal or State law, 20in no case may a school board expel a student in kindergarten 21through grade 2. Subject to this grade level restriction, 22expulsion Expulsion shall take place only after the parents or 23guardians have been requested to appear at a meeting of the 24board, or with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss 25their child's behavior. Such request shall be made by   SB2423- 29 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1registered or certified mail and shall state the time, place 2and purpose of the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer 3appointed by it, at such meeting shall state the reasons for 4dismissal and the date on which the expulsion is to become 5effective. If a hearing officer is appointed by the board, the 6hearing officer shall report to the board a written summary of 7the evidence heard at the meeting and the board may take such 8action thereon as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to 9expel a student, the written expulsion decision shall detail 10the specific reasons why removing the student from the 11learning environment is in the best interest of the school. 12The expulsion decision shall also include a rationale as to 13the specific duration of the expulsion. An expelled student 14may be immediately transferred to an alternative program in 15the manner provided in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A 16student must not be denied transfer because of the expulsion, 17except in cases in which such transfer is deemed to cause a 18threat to the safety of students or staff in the alternative 19program. 20    (b) For students in grades 3 through 12, to To suspend or 21by policy to authorize the superintendent of the district or 22the principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 23school to suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or 24misconduct, or to suspend students guilty of gross 25disobedience or misconduct on the school bus from riding the 26school bus, pursuant to subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this   SB2423- 30 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 2suspension. The board may by policy authorize the 3superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 4principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 5students guilty of such acts for a period not to exceed 10 6school days. If a student is suspended due to gross 7disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board may 8suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 9reasons. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 10Section, in no case may the decision to suspend a student in 11kindergarten through grade 2 for 3 or more days be made by 12anyone other than the superintendent of the district nor may 13the length of the suspension for any student in kindergarten 14through grade 2 be for longer than the number of days required 15by the district to develop and implement a behavior 16intervention plan or safety plan. 17    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 18parents or guardians of a student along with a full statement 19of the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right 20to a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 21notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 22suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardians, 23the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 24review such action of the superintendent or principal, 25assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 26parents or guardians of the student may appear and discuss the   SB2423- 31 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 2officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 3a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 4its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 5hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 6appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 7subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 8decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 9misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 10suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 11specific duration of the suspension. A student who is 12suspended in excess of 20 school days may be immediately 13transferred to an alternative program in the manner provided 14in Article 13A or 13B of this Code, subject to the restrictions 15for transfer set forth therein. A student shall not be denied 16transfer because of the suspension, except in cases in which 17such transfer is deemed to cause a threat to the safety of 18students or staff in the alternative program. 19    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 20and consequences available to school officials, school 21exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 22are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number 23and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 24extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 25only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 26students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is   SB2423- 32 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1recommended that school officials consider forms of 2non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 3suspensions or expulsions. 4    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 5Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 6by which school administrators are required to suspend or 7expel students for particular behaviors.8    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 9used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 10pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other 11students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 12subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 13other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 14a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 15School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 16such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 17length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.18    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 19out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions 20for students in grades 3 through 12 or, if required by federal 21or State law, expulsions for students in kindergarten through 22grade 2, and disciplinary removals to alternative schools for 23students who meet the grade level restrictions set forth in 24Articles 13A and 13B may be used only if other appropriate and 25available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 26exhausted and the student's continuing presence in school   SB2423- 33 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1would either (i) pose a threat to the safety of other students, 2staff, or members of the school community or (ii) 3substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the operation 4of the school. For purposes of this subsection (b-20), "threat 5to the safety of other students, staff, or members of the 6school community" and "substantially disrupt, impede, or 7interfere with the operation of the school" shall be 8determined on a case-by-case basis by school officials. For 9purposes of this subsection (b-20), the determination of 10whether "appropriate and available behavioral and disciplinary 11interventions have been exhausted" shall be made by school 12officials. School officials shall make all reasonable efforts 13to resolve such threats, address such disruptions, and 14minimize the length of student exclusions to the greatest 15extent practicable. Within the suspension decision described 16in subsection (b) of this Section or the expulsion decision 17described in subsection (a) of this Section, it shall be 18documented whether other interventions were attempted or 19whether it was determined that there were no other appropriate 20and available interventions.21    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 22than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 23support services during the period of their suspension. For 24purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 25support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 26Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of   SB2423- 34 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 2to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 3such appropriate and available services. 4    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 5appropriate and available support services.6    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 7re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 8expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 9consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 10Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 11and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 12suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 13alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 14Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 15    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 16suspended students, including those students suspended from 17the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 18school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 19equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 20a student's parents or guardians to notify school officials 21that a student suspended from the school bus does not have 22alternate transportation to school. 23    (b-35) In all suspension review hearings conducted under 24subsection (b) or expulsion hearings conducted under 25subsection (a), a student may disclose any factor to be 26considered in mitigation, including his or her status as a   SB2423- 35 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 2violence, as defined in Article 26A. A representative of the 3parent's or guardian's choice, or of the student's choice if 4emancipated, must be permitted to represent the student 5throughout the proceedings and to address the school board or 6its appointed hearing officer. With the approval of the 7student's parent or guardian, or of the student if 8emancipated, a support person must be permitted to accompany 9the student to any disciplinary hearings or proceedings. The 10representative or support person must comply with any rules of 11the school district's hearing process. If the representative 12or support person violates the rules or engages in behavior or 13advocacy that harasses, abuses, or intimidates either party, a 14witness, or anyone else in attendance at the hearing, the 15representative or support person may be prohibited from 16further participation in the hearing or proceeding. A 17suspension or expulsion proceeding under this subsection 18(b-35) must be conducted independently from any ongoing 19criminal investigation or proceeding, and an absence of 20pending or possible criminal charges, criminal investigations, 21or proceedings may not be a factor in school disciplinary 22decisions.23    (b-40) During a suspension review hearing conducted under 24subsection (b) or an expulsion hearing conducted under 25subsection (a) that involves allegations of sexual violence by 26the student who is subject to discipline, neither the student   SB2423- 36 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1nor his or her representative shall directly question nor have 2direct contact with the alleged victim. The student who is 3subject to discipline or his or her representative may, at the 4discretion and direction of the school board or its appointed 5hearing officer, suggest questions to be posed by the school 6board or its appointed hearing officer to the alleged victim. 7    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 8local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 9meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 10the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.11    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 12provide ongoing professional development to all school 13personnel, school board members, and school resource officers 14on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the 15adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 16involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 17culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 18environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 19the appropriate and available supportive services for the 20promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 21developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 22positive and healthy school climates. 23    (d) The board may expel a student in grades 3 through 12 24or, if required by federal or State law, a student in 25kindergarten through grade 2 for a definite period of time not 26to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case   SB2423- 37 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1basis. A student who is determined to have brought one of the 2following objects to school, any school-sponsored activity or 3event, or any activity or event that bears a reasonable 4relationship to school shall be expelled for a period of not 5less than one year:6        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 7    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 8    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 9    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 10    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 11    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 12    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 13    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 14    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.15        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 16    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 17    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 18    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 19    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 20    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 21    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 22    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 23Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 24consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 25Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 26expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a   SB2423- 38 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 2Article 13A of the School Code.3    (d-5) For a student in grades 3 through 12, the The board 4may suspend or by regulation authorize the superintendent of 5the district or the principal, assistant principal, or dean of 6students of any school to suspendor, for a student in 7kindergarten through grade 2, the board may suspend or by 8regulation authorize the superintendent of the district to 9suspend a student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or 10may expel a student in grades 3 through 12 or, if required by 11federal or State law, a student in kindergarten through grade 122 for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 calendar years, 13as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) that student has 14been determined to have made an explicit threat on an Internet 15website against a school employee, a student, or any 16school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet website through 17which the threat was made is a site that was accessible within 18the school at the time the threat was made or was available to 19third parties who worked or studied within the school grounds 20at the time the threat was made, and (iii) the threat could be 21reasonably interpreted as threatening to the safety and 22security of the threatened individual because of the 23individual's duties or employment status or status as a 24student inside the school. 25    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 26authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as   SB2423- 39 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 2equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 3personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 4without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 5search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 6Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 7privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 8left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 9the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 10conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 11lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 12controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 13illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 14searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 15If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 16evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 17the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 18such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 19disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 20turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.21    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 22expulsion from school and all school activities and a 23prohibition from being present on school grounds.24    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 25a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 26public or private school in this or any other state, the   SB2423- 40 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 2expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 3of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 4under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 5school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 6or staff in the alternative program. A school district that 7adopts a policy under this subsection (g) must include a 8provision allowing for consideration of any mitigating 9factors, including, but not limited to, a student's status as 10a parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 11violence, as defined in Article 26A. 12    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 13students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 14difficulties.15    (i) A student may not be issued a monetary fine or fee as a 16disciplinary consequence, though this shall not preclude 17requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, stolen, 18or damaged property.19    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 20apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 21special charter districts, and school districts organized 22under Article 34 of this Code. 23    (k) Through June 30, 2026, the expulsion of students 24enrolled in programs funded under Section 1C-2 of this Code is 25subject to the requirements under paragraph (7) of subsection 26(a) of Section 2-3.71 of this Code.   SB2423- 41 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1    (k-5) On and after July 1, 2026, the expulsion of children 2enrolled in programs funded under Section 15-25 of the 3Department of Early Childhood Act is subject to the 4requirements of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 515-30 of the Department of Early Childhood Act. The suspension 6of students enrolled in programs funded under Section 1C-2 of 7this Code is subject to the requirements under paragraph (8) 8of subsection (a) of Section 2-3.71 of this Code. 9    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 10district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 11focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 12positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 13A school district may employ a school social worker or a 14licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 15suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12. 16(Source: P.A. 102-466, eff. 7-1-25; 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 17102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 188-9-24; revised 9-25-24.) 19    (105 ILCS 5/13B-20.25)20    Sec. 13B-20.25. Eligible students. Students in 21kindergarten grades 4 through grade 12 who meet enrollment 22criteria established by the school district and who meet the 23definition of "student at risk of academic failure" are 24eligible to participate in an alternative learning 25opportunities program funded under this Article.   SB2423- 42 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2enrollment in a charter alternative learning opportunities 3program shall be open to any student pupil who has been 4expelled or suspended for more than 20 days under Section 510-22.6 or 34-19 of this Code. All rights granted under this 6Article to a student's parent or guardian become exclusively 7those of the student upon the student's 18th birthday.8(Source: P.A. 97-495, eff. 1-1-12.) 9    (105 ILCS 5/13B-20.30)10    Sec. 13B-20.30. Location of program. A school district 11must consider offering an alternative learning opportunities 12program on-site in the regular school. An alternative learning 13opportunities program may be provided at facilities separate 14from the regular school or in classrooms elsewhere on school 15premises. A school district is encouraged to ensure that 16educational supports and other services are provided to the 17student as part of the student's activities in the classroom 18to which the student is originally assigned, unless the nature 19of the services dictate otherwise.20(Source: P.A. 92-42, eff. 1-1-02.) 21    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 22changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 23that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 24represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does   SB2423- 43 -LRB104 10323 LNS 20397 b1not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 2made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 3Public Act.